Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.150 and 2024 c 209 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than ((120))168 hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.(d) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person and his or her guardian, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within ((120))168 hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor or traditional cultural healer to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.(5) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision is made. If a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment is filed, the designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before the hearing, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3) and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan.Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.153 and 2023 c 433 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any, the designated crisis responder may take such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency custody in an emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, for not more than ((one hundred twenty))168 hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.(2) A peace officer or other first responder may take or cause such person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or the emergency department of a local hospital under subsection (1) of this section or when he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a behavioral health disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, evaluation and treatment facility, emergency department of a local hospital, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program by peace officers or other first responders pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to ((twelve))120 hours, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance.(4) Within three hours after arrival at an emergency department, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the person must be examined by a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional. Within ((twelve))120 hours of notice of the need for evaluation, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, the designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. In conjunction with this evaluation, the facility where the patient is located must inquire as to a person's veteran status or eligibility for veterans benefits and, if the person appears to be potentially eligible for these benefits, inquire whether the person would be amenable to treatment by the veterans health administration compared to other relevant treatment options. This information must be shared with the designated crisis responder. If the person has been identified as being potentially eligible for veterans health administration services and as being amenable for those services, and if appropriate in light of all reasonably available information about the person's circumstances, the designated crisis responder must first refer the person to the veterans health administration for mental health or substance use disorder treatment at a facility capable of meeting the needs of the person including, but not limited to, the involuntary treatment options available at the Seattle division of the VA Puget Sound health care system. If the person is accepted for treatment by the veterans health administration, and is willing to accept treatment by the veterans health administration as an alternative to other available treatment options, the designated crisis responder, the veterans health administration, and the facility where the patient is located will work to make arrangements to have the person transported to a veterans health administration facility. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview. If the individual is detained, the designated crisis responder shall file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is released to the community, the behavioral health service provider shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact information to the provider.(5) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section based on the intent of this chapter under RCW 71.05.010 except in the few cases where the facility staff or designated crisis responder has totally disregarded the requirements of this section.(6) For purposes of this section, "first responder" has the same meaning given in RCW 5.60.060.Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.170 and 2020 c 302 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:Whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of a person whose actions constitute a likelihood of serious harm, or who is gravely disabled, the facility providing ((one hundred twenty))168 hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. The facility shall then evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain, transfer, or discharge such person in accordance with RCW 71.05.210. The facility shall notify in writing the court and the designated crisis responder of the date and time of the initial detention of each person involuntarily detained in order that a probable cause hearing shall be held no later than ((one hundred twenty))168 hours after detention.The duty of a state hospital to accept persons for evaluation and treatment under this section shall be limited by chapter 71.24 RCW.Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.180 and 2020 c 302 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the person, it may detain him or her for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed ((one hundred twenty))168 hours from the time of acceptance as set forth in RCW 71.05.170. The computation of such ((one hundred twenty))168 hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays and holidays.Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.182 and 2020 c 302 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person who under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 has been detained at a facility for a period of not more than ((one hundred twenty))168 hours for the purpose of evaluation and treatment on the grounds that the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, but who has not been subsequently committed for involuntary treatment under RCW 71.05.240, may not have in his or her possession or control any firearm for a period of six months after the date that the person is detained.(2) Before the discharge of a person who has been initially detained under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 on the grounds that the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, but has not been subsequently committed for involuntary treatment under RCW 71.05.240, the designated crisis responder shall inform the person orally and in writing that:(a) He or she is prohibited from possessing or controlling any firearm for a period of six months;(b) He or she must immediately surrender, for the six-month period, any concealed pistol license and any firearms that the person possesses or controls to the sheriff of the county or the chief of police of the municipality in which the person is domiciled;(c) After the six-month suspension, the person's right to control or possess any firearm or concealed pistol license shall be automatically restored, absent further restrictions imposed by other law; and(d) Upon discharge, the person may petition the superior court to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored before the six-month suspension period has elapsed by following the procedures provided in RCW 9.41.047(3).(3) The designated crisis responder shall notify the sheriff of the county or the chief of police of the municipality in which the person is domiciled of the six-month suspension.(4) A law enforcement agency holding any firearm that has been surrendered pursuant to this section shall, upon the request of the person from whom it was obtained, return the firearm at the expiration of the six-month suspension period, or prior to the expiration of the six-month period if the person's right to possess firearms has been restored by the court under RCW 9.41.047. The law enforcement agency, prior to returning the firearm, shall verify with the prosecuting attorney's office or designated crisis responders that the person has not been previously or subsequently committed for involuntary treatment under RCW 71.05.240. The law enforcement agency must comply with the provisions of RCW 9.41.345 when returning a firearm pursuant to this section.(5) Any firearm surrendered pursuant to this section that remains unclaimed by the lawful owner shall be disposed of in accordance with the law enforcement agency's policies and procedures for the disposal of firearms in police custody.Sec. 6. RCW 71.05.210 and 2021 c 264 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:(a) Shall, within ((twenty-four))24 hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:(i) One physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional; and(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning ((twenty-four))24 hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to ((one hundred twenty))168 hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for ((one hundred twenty))168 hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.(2) If, at any time during the involuntary treatment hold and following the initial examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or substance use disorder professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement for the remainder of the current commitment period without any need for further court review.(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than ((fourteen))14 days.Sec. 7. RCW 71.05.210 and 2025 c 58 s 5147 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:(a) Shall, within ((twenty-four))24 hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:(i) One physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse; and(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional; and(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning ((twenty-four))24 hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to ((one hundred twenty))168 hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for ((one hundred twenty))168 hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.(2) If, at any time during the involuntary treatment hold and following the initial examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or substance use disorder professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement for the remainder of the current commitment period without any need for further court review.(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than ((fourteen))14 days.Sec. 8. RCW 71.05.217 and 2024 c 209 s 20 and 2024 c 62 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Insofar as danger to the individual or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions, and hospitals providing such services:(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;(g) To have the right to individualized care and adequate treatment;(h) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;(i) To not be denied access to treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed;(j) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4) or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the following standards and procedures:(i) The administration of antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered unless the petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that there exists a compelling state interest that justifies overriding the patient's lack of consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications or electroconvulsant therapy, that the proposed treatment is necessary and effective, and that medically acceptable alternative forms of treatment are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective.(ii) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (A) The existence of one or more compelling state interests; (B) the necessity and effectiveness of the treatment; and (C) the person's desires regarding the proposed treatment. If the patient is unable to make a rational and informed decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed treatment, the court shall make a substituted judgment for the patient as if he or she were competent to make such a determination.(iii) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request to administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy filed pursuant to this subsection. The person has the right: (A) To be represented by an attorney; (B) to present evidence; (C) to cross-examine witnesses; (D) to have the rules of evidence enforced; (E) to remain silent; (F) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and (G) to be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare for the hearing. The court may appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician designated by such person or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.(iv) An order for the administration of antipsychotic medications entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be effective for the period of the current involuntary treatment order, and any interim period during which the person is awaiting trial or hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or involuntary medication.(v) Any person detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4), who subsequently refuses antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth in this subsection.(vi) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a nonconsenting person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter without a court order pursuant to RCW 71.05.215(2) or under the following circumstances:(A) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;(B) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective; and(C)(I) In the opinion of the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner with responsibility for treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.(II) If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack of consent pursuant to this subsection, a petition for an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner with responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held;(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue;(l) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;(m) To not be denied access to treatment by cultural or spiritual means through practices that are in accordance with a tribal or cultural tradition in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed.(2) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter and retains all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as limited by chapter 9.41 RCW.(3) No person may be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving evaluation or treatment for a behavioral health disorder. Competency may not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 RCW.(4) Subject to RCW 71.05.745 and related regulations, persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter must be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.(5) Whenever any person is detained under this chapter, the person must be advised that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within ((120))168 hours of the initial detention, a judicial hearing must be held in a superior court within ((120))168 hours to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person for up to an additional ((14))21 days based on an allegation that because of a behavioral health disorder the person presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, and that at the probable cause hearing the person has the following rights:(a) To communicate immediately with an attorney; to have an attorney appointed if the person is indigent; and to be told the name and address of the attorney that has been designated;(b) To remain silent, and to know that any statement the person makes may be used against him or her;(c) To present evidence on the person's behalf;(d) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;(e) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;(f) To have the court appoint a reasonably available independent professional person to examine the person and testify in the hearing, at public expense unless the person is able to bear the cost;(g) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and(h) To refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning 24 hours prior to the probable cause hearing.(6) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section must be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.(7)(a) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician assistants, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges are waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.(b) The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.(c) The record maker may not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.(8) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.(9) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.(10) The rights set forth under this section apply equally to 90-day or 180-day hearings under RCW 71.05.310.Sec. 9. RCW 71.05.217 and 2025 c 58 s 5149 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Insofar as danger to the individual or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions, and hospitals providing such services:(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;(g) To have the right to individualized care and adequate treatment;(h) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;(i) To not be denied access to treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed;(j) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4) or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the following standards and procedures:(i) The administration of antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered unless the petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that there exists a compelling state interest that justifies overriding the patient's lack of consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications or electroconvulsant therapy, that the proposed treatment is necessary and effective, and that medically acceptable alternative forms of treatment are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective.(ii) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (A) The existence of one or more compelling state interests; (B) the necessity and effectiveness of the treatment; and (C) the person's desires regarding the proposed treatment. If the patient is unable to make a rational and informed decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed treatment, the court shall make a substituted judgment for the patient as if he or she were competent to make such a determination.(iii) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request to administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy filed pursuant to this subsection. The person has the right: (A) To be represented by an attorney; (B) to present evidence; (C) to cross-examine witnesses; (D) to have the rules of evidence enforced; (E) to remain silent; (F) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and (G) to be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare for the hearing. The court may appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician designated by such person or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.(iv) An order for the administration of antipsychotic medications entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be effective for the period of the current involuntary treatment order, and any interim period during which the person is awaiting trial or hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or involuntary medication.(v) Any person detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4), who subsequently refuses antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth in this subsection.(vi) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a nonconsenting person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter without a court order pursuant to RCW 71.05.215(2) or under the following circumstances:(A) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;(B) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective; and(C)(I) In the opinion of the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse with responsibility for treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.(II) If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack of consent pursuant to this subsection, a petition for an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse with responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held;(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue;(l) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;(m) To not be denied access to treatment by cultural or spiritual means through practices that are in accordance with a tribal or cultural tradition in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed.(2) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter and retains all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as limited by chapter 9.41 RCW.(3) No person may be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving evaluation or treatment for a behavioral health disorder. Competency may not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 RCW.(4) Subject to RCW 71.05.745 and related regulations, persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter must be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.(5) Whenever any person is detained under this chapter, the person must be advised that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within ((120))168 hours of the initial detention, a judicial hearing must be held in a superior court within ((120))168 hours to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person for up to an additional ((14))21 days based on an allegation that because of a behavioral health disorder the person presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, and that at the probable cause hearing the person has the following rights:(a) To communicate immediately with an attorney; to have an attorney appointed if the person is indigent; and to be told the name and address of the attorney that has been designated;(b) To remain silent, and to know that any statement the person makes may be used against him or her;(c) To present evidence on the person's behalf;(d) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;(e) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;(f) To have the court appoint a reasonably available independent professional person to examine the person and testify in the hearing, at public expense unless the person is able to bear the cost;(g) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and(h) To refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning 24 hours prior to the probable cause hearing.(6) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section must be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.(7)(a) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician assistants, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurses are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges are waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.(b) The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.(c) The record maker may not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.(8) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.(9) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.(10) The rights set forth under this section apply equally to 90-day or 180-day hearings under RCW 71.05.310.Sec. 10. RCW 71.05.230 and 2022 c 210 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:A person detained for ((one hundred twenty))168 hours of evaluation and treatment may be committed for not more than ((fourteen))21 additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ((ninety))90 additional days of a less restrictive alternative treatment. A petition may only be filed if the following conditions are met:(1) The professional staff of the facility providing evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that the condition is caused by a behavioral health disorder and results in: (a) A likelihood of serious harm; or (b) the person being gravely disabled; and are prepared to testify those conditions are met; and(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she has not in good faith volunteered; and(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to provide such treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745; and(4)(a)(i) The professional staff of the facility or the designated crisis responder has filed a petition with the court for a ((fourteen))21 day involuntary detention or a ((ninety))90 day less restrictive alternative. The petition must be signed by:(A) One physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner. The persons signing the petition must have examined the person.(b) If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services; and(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person, his or her attorney, and his or her guardian, if any, prior to the probable cause hearing; and(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person if no other counsel has appeared; and(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed for mental health treatment; and(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder may petition for an additional period of either 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment or 90 days of involuntary intensive treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment has agreed to assume such responsibility.Sec. 11. RCW 71.05.230 and 2025 c 58 s 5150 are each amended to read as follows:A person detained for ((one hundred twenty))168 hours of evaluation and treatment may be committed for not more than ((fourteen))21 additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ((ninety))90 additional days of a less restrictive alternative treatment. A petition may only be filed if the following conditions are met:(1) The professional staff of the facility providing evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that the condition is caused by a behavioral health disorder and results in: (a) A likelihood of serious harm; or (b) the person being gravely disabled; and are prepared to testify those conditions are met; and(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she has not in good faith volunteered; and(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to provide such treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745; and(4)(a)(i) The professional staff of the facility or the designated crisis responder has filed a petition with the court for a ((fourteen))21 day involuntary detention or a ((ninety))90 day less restrictive alternative. The petition must be signed by:(A) One physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse; and(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional.(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced practice registered nurse instead of a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse. The persons signing the petition must have examined the person.(b) If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services; and(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person, his or her attorney, and his or her guardian, if any, prior to the probable cause hearing; and(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person if no other counsel has appeared; and(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed for mental health treatment; and(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder may petition for an additional period of either 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment or 90 days of involuntary intensive treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment has agreed to assume such responsibility.Sec. 12. RCW 71.05.235 and 2023 c 453 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an individual is referred to a designated crisis responder under RCW 10.77.650(6)(a), the designated crisis responder shall examine the individual within ((forty-eight))48 hours. If the designated crisis responder determines it is not appropriate to detain the individual or petition for a ((ninety-day))90-day less restrictive alternative under RCW 71.05.230(4), that decision shall be immediately presented to the superior court for hearing. The court shall hold a hearing to consider the decision of the designated crisis responder not later than the next judicial day. At the hearing the superior court shall review the determination of the designated crisis responder and determine whether an order should be entered requiring the person to be evaluated at an evaluation and treatment facility. No person referred to an evaluation and treatment facility may be held at the facility longer than ((one hundred twenty))168 hours.(2) If an individual is placed in an evaluation and treatment facility under RCW 10.77.650(6)(b), a professional person shall evaluate the individual for purposes of determining whether to file a ((ninety-day))90-day inpatient or outpatient petition under this chapter. Before expiration of the ((one hundred twenty))120 hour evaluation period authorized under RCW 10.77.650(6)(b), the professional person shall file a petition or, if the recommendation of the professional person is to release the individual, present his or her recommendation to the superior court of the county in which the criminal charge was dismissed. The superior court shall review the recommendation not later than ((forty-eight))48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the recommendation is presented. If the court rejects the recommendation to unconditionally release the individual, the court may order the individual detained at a designated evaluation and treatment facility for not more than a ((one hundred twenty))168 hour evaluation and treatment period. If the evaluation and treatment facility files a ((ninety-day))90-day petition within the ((one hundred twenty))168 hour period, the clerk shall set a hearing after the day of filing consistent with RCW 71.05.300. Upon the individual's first appearance in court after a petition has been filed, proceedings under RCW 71.05.310 and 71.05.320 shall commence. For an individual subject to this subsection, the professional person may directly file a petition for ((ninety-day))90-day inpatient or outpatient treatment and no petition for initial detention or ((fourteen-day))21-day detention is required before such a petition may be filed.(3) If a designated crisis responder or the professional person and prosecuting attorney for the county in which the criminal charge was dismissed or attorney general, as appropriate, stipulate that the individual does not present a likelihood of serious harm or is not gravely disabled, the hearing under this section is not required and the individual, if in custody, shall be released.Sec. 13. RCW 71.05.240 and 2022 c 210 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a petition is filed for up to ((14))21 days of involuntary treatment, 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment, or 18 months of less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.148, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within ((120))168 hours of the initial detention under RCW 71.05.180, or at a time scheduled under RCW 71.05.148.(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court or the prosecutor at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section.(3) If the person or his or her attorney alleges, prior to the commencement of the hearing, that the person has in good faith volunteered for treatment, the petitioner must show, by preponderance of the evidence, that the person has not in good faith volunteered for appropriate treatment. In order to qualify as a good faith volunteer, the person must abide by procedures and a treatment plan as prescribed by a treatment facility and professional staff.(4)(a) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed ((fourteen))21 days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.(b) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ((ninety))90 days.(c) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person subject to a petition under RCW 71.05.148, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to 18 months.(5) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the treatment recommendations of the behavioral health service provider.(6) The court shall notify the person orally and in writing that if involuntary treatment is sought beyond the ((14-day))21-day inpatient or 90-day less restrictive treatment period, such person has the right to a full hearing or jury trial under RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also notify the person orally and in writing that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.(7) If the court does not issue an order to detain or commit a person under this section, the court shall issue an order to dismiss the petition.(8) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).Sec. 14. RCW 71.05.290 and 2023 c 453 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:(1) At any time during a person's ((14-day))21-day intensive treatment period, the professional person in charge of a treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may petition the superior court for an order requiring such person to undergo an additional period of treatment. Such petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280.(2)(a)(i) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need for further commitment and shall be supported by affidavits based on an examination of the patient and signed by:(A) One physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner; and(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or mental health professional.(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced registered nurse practitioner instead of a psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner.(b) The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained person which supports the petition and shall explain what, if any, less restrictive treatments which are alternatives to detention are available to such person, and shall state the willingness of the affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent judicial proceedings under this chapter. If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.645(7), then the professional person in charge of the treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may directly file a petition for 180-day treatment under RCW 71.05.280(3), or for 90-day treatment under RCW 71.05.280 (1), (2), or (4). No petition for initial detention or ((14-day))21-day detention is required before such a petition may be filed.Sec. 15. RCW 71.05.290 and 2025 c 58 s 5151 are each amended to read as follows:(1) At any time during a person's ((14-day))21-day intensive treatment period, the professional person in charge of a treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may petition the superior court for an order requiring such person to undergo an additional period of treatment. Such petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280.(2)(a)(i) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need for further commitment and shall be supported by affidavits based on an examination of the patient and signed by:(A) One physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse; and(B) One physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional.(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced practice registered nurse instead of a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse.(b) The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained person which supports the petition and shall explain what, if any, less restrictive treatments which are alternatives to detention are available to such person, and shall state the willingness of the affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent judicial proceedings under this chapter. If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.645(7), then the professional person in charge of the treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may directly file a petition for 180-day treatment under RCW 71.05.280(3), or for 90-day treatment under RCW 71.05.280 (1), (2), or (4). No petition for initial detention or ((14-day))21-day detention is required before such a petition may be filed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. Except for sections 7, 9, 11, and 15, this act takes effect July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. Sections 6, 8, 10, and 14 of this act expire June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. Sections 7, 9, 11, and 15 of this act take effect June 30, 2027.--- END ---